Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB921.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article II heading of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended to read:ARTICLE IIGENERAL POWERS AND DUTIESOF THE DEPARTMENT OF [PUBLIC WELFARE] HUMAN SERVICESSection 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Secti on 217. Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program.--(a) No later than July 1, 2026 , the department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, 123456789101112131415161718 shall establish the Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program, to be administered by the department.(b) The purpose of the program is to provide assistance for eligible individuals who are water system customers or wastewater system customers in this Commonwealth for overdue water system bills or wastewater system bills upon the termination of the temporary Federal Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program.(c) The department shall develop eligibility requirements under the program in accordance with this subsection, without limitation. An individual eligible for assistance under the program must meet all of the following requirements:(1) Own or rent a home in this Commonwealth.(2) Be a water system customer or wastewater system customer and be financially responsible for paying the water system bills or wastewater system bills.(3) Have an overdue water system bill or wastewater system bill, which has resulted in arrearages, a termination notice or the termination of water system services or wastewater system services.(4) Comply with certain income guidelines as determined by the department.(d) A water system entity or wastewater system entity may apply for a grant under the program on behalf of eligible individuals described under subsection (c) on a form and in a manner determined by the department. A completed application must contain all of the following:(1) The name and contact information of the water system entity or wastewater system entity seeking the grant.(2) The names and addresses of the water system customers or 20250HB0921PN0970 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wastewater system customers seeking assistance under the program along with verification of their eligibility to receive services under the program.(3) The amount of the overdue water system bills or wastewater system bills for the customers seeking assistance under the program, along with the circumstances that have resulted from the overdue bills, including arrearages, termination notices or termination of services.(e) The department shall review each application under subsection (d) and determine the amount of the grant to be awarded, including the designated individuals eligible to receive assistance under the program and any conditions regarding the award of the grant.(f) A grant under the program may only be used for the following purposes : (1) Preventing the termination of water system services or wastewater system services.(2) Paying past-due water system bills or wastewater system bills.(3) Restoring terminated water system services or wastewater system services.(g) The following shall apply to reports:(1) Each July 1 following the effective date of this subsection, the department shall issue a report on all of the following:(i) The water system entities and wastewater system entities that have sought a grant under the program.(ii) The water system entities and wastewater system entities that have received a grant under the program.(iii) The number of customers who received assistance under 20250HB0921PN0970 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the program, along with the amount and purpose of the grant received by each customer.(iv) The total amount of money expended under the program.(2) The department shall submit each report under this subsection to all of the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(iii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iv) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate.(v) The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(vii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) Each report under this subsection shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(h) Rulemaking authority.--The department shall promulgate any rules, regulations or guidelines necessary to implement this section.(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:"Program" means the Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program established under subsection (a)."Wastewater system" means as the term "sewer system" is defined under 25 Pa. Code § 94.1 (relating to definitions)."Water system" means a public water system that serves at least fifteen service connections used by year-round residents 20250HB0921PN0970 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or regularly serves at least twenty-five year-round residents.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0921PN0970 - 5 - 12